Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2722.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 9-1 of the General Laws entitled "Causes of Action" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
9-1-55. Recovery of replacement value of a child restraint system in a motor vehicle
accident.
(a) Any person responsible for a collision with a motor vehicle, which contains or employs
a federally approved child restraint system under 49 CFR § 571.213 that is being used to transport
a child in compliance with § 31-22-22 or which is unoccupied at the time of the collision, shall be
liable to the owner of the child restraint system for the replacement value of the child restraint
system.
(b) The person responsible for the collision or their insurer shall be entitled to take
possession of the child restraint system upon payment of the replacement value pursuant to the
provisions of subsection (a) of this section.
(c) The provision of this section shall apply regardless of the lack of any visible damage to
the child restraint system.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005337
========